Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 1 General Provisions as to Civil Actions
§ 1-1-130.
Actions
against health care providers; admissibility of evidence.

In any civil action or arbitration brought by an alleged victim of an unanticipated outcome of medical care against a health care provider, any and all statements, affirmations, gestures or conduct expressing apology, sympathy, commiseration, condolence, compassion or a general sense of benevolence that are made by a health care provider or an employee of a health care provider to the alleged victim, or to a relative or representative of the alleged victim, and that relate to the discomfort, pain, suffering, injury or death of the alleged victim as the result of the unanticipated outcome of medical care, are inadmissible as evidence of an admission of liability or as evidence of an admission against interest.

For purposes of this section:

“Health care provider” means a person who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted by the laws of this state to administer health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession;

“Relative” means a spouse, parent, grandparent, stepfather, stepmother, child, grandchild, brother, sister, half brother, half sister or parent of a spouse, and includes those relationships established by adoption;

“Representative” means a legal guardian, attorney, person designated to make decisions on behalf of a patient under a medical power of attorney or any person recognized in law or custom as a patient’s agent;

“Unanticipated outcome” means the result of a medical treatment or procedure that differs from an expected result.

History.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 1, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 1, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 17, 2004.

§ 1-1-131.
Short title.

This act shall be known
and may be cited as the “Successor Corporation Asbestos-Related Liability
Fairness Act.”

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 1-1-132.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Asbestos claim” means any claim, wherever or whenever made, for damages, losses, indemnification, contribution or other relief arising out of, based on or in any way related to asbestos, including:

The health effects of exposure to asbestos, including a claim for personal injury or death, mental or emotional injury, risk of disease or other injury, or the costs of medical monitoring or surveillance;

Any claim made by or on behalf of any person exposed to asbestos, or a representative, spouse, parent, child or other relative of the person; and

Any claim for damage or loss caused by the installation, presence or removal of asbestos.

“Corporation” means a corporation for profit, including a domestic corporation organized under the laws of this state or a foreign corporation organized under laws other than the laws of this state;

“Successor” means a corporation that assumes or incurs or has assumed or incurred successor asbestos-related liabilities that is a successor and became a successor before May 13, 1968, or is any of that successor corporation’s successors;

“Successor asbestos-related liabilities” means any liability, whether known or unknown, asserted or unasserted, absolute or contingent, accrued or unaccrued, liquidated or unliquidated or due or to become due, which is related to asbestos claims and was assumed or incurred by a corporation as a result of or in connection with a merger or consolidation or the plan of merger or consolidation related to the merger or consolidation with or into another corporation, or that is related in any way to asbestos claims based on the exercise of control or the ownership of stock of the corporation before the merger or consolidation. The term includes liabilities that, after the time of the merger or consolidation for which the fair market value of total gross assets is determined under W.S.

1-1-135

, were or are paid or otherwise discharged, or committed to be paid or otherwise discharged, by or on behalf of the corporation or by a successor of the corporation or by or on behalf of a transferor, in connection with settlements, judgments or other discharges in this state or another jurisdiction;

“Transferor” means a corporation from which successor asbestos-related liabilities are or were assumed or incurred.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 1-1-133.
Applicability.

The limitations in W.S.

1-1-134

shall apply to any successor corporation.

The limitations of W.S.

1-1-134

shall not apply to:

Workers’ compensation benefits paid by or on behalf of an employer to an employee under the provisions of Wyoming statutes, title 27, chapter 14 or a comparable workers’ compensation law of another jurisdiction;

Any claim against a corporation that does not constitute a successor asbestos-related liability;

Any obligation under the National Labor Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. Section 151, et seq., as amended, or under any collective bargaining agreement;

A successor that, after a merger or consolidation, continued in the business of mining asbestos or in the business of selling or distributing asbestos fibers or in the business of manufacturing, distributing, removing or installing asbestos-containing products; or

Any claim against a corporation that was filed in a court of competent jurisdiction prior to the effective date of this act.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 1-1-134.
Limitations
on successor asbestos-related liabilities.

Except as further limited in subsection (b) of this section, the cumulative successor asbestos-related liabilities of a successor corporation are limited to the fair market value of the total gross assets of the transferor determined as of the time of the merger or consolidation. The successor corporation shall not have responsibility for successor asbestos-related liabilities in excess of this limitation.

If the transferor had assumed or incurred successor asbestos-related liabilities in connection with a prior merger or consolidation with a prior transferor, then the fair market value of the total assets of the prior transferor determined as of the time of the earlier merger or consolidation shall be substituted for the limitation set forth in subsection (a) of this section for purposes of determining the limitation of liability of a successor corporation.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 1-1-135.
Establishing
fair market value of total assets.

A successor corporation may establish the fair market value of total gross assets for the purpose of the limitations under W.S.

1-1-134

through any method reasonable under the circumstances, including:

By reference to the going concern value of the assets or to the purchase price attributable to or paid for the assets in an arms-length transaction; or

In the absence of other readily available information from which the fair market value can be determined, by reference to the value of the assets recorded on a balance sheet.

Total gross assets include intangible assets.

To the extent total gross assets include any liability insurance that was issued to the transferor whose assets are being valued for purposes of this section the applicability, terms, conditions and limits of such insurance shall not be affected by this section, nor shall this section otherwise affect the rights and obligations of an insurer, transferor or successor under any insurance contract or any related agreements, including, without limitation, preenactment settlements resolving coverage-related disputes, and the rights of an insurer to seek payment for applicable deductibles, retrospective premiums or self-insured retentions or to seek contribution from a successor for uninsured or self-insured periods or periods where insurance is uncollectible or otherwise unavailable. Without limiting the foregoing, to the extent total gross assets include any such liability insurance, a settlement of a dispute concerning any such liability insurance coverage entered into by a transferor or successor with the insurers of the transferor before July 1, 2011 shall be determinative of the total coverage of such liability insurance to be included in the calculation of the transferor’s total gross assets.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 1-1-136.
Adjustment.

Except as provided in subsections (b) through (d) of this section, the fair market value of total gross assets at the time of the merger or consolidation shall increase annually at a rate equal to the sum of:

The prime rate as listed in the first edition of the Wall Street Journal published for each calendar year since the merger or consolidation, unless the prime rate is not published in that edition of the Wall Street Journal, in which case any reasonable determination of the prime rate on the first day of the year may be used; and

One percent (1%).

The rate found in subsection (a) of this section shall not be compounded.

The adjustment of the fair market value of total gross assets shall continue as provided in subsection (a) of this section until the date the adjusted value is first exceeded by the cumulative amounts of successor asbestos-related liabilities paid or committed to be paid by or on behalf of the successor corporation or a predecessor or by or on behalf of a transferor after the time of the merger or consolidation for which the fair market value of total gross assets is determined.

No adjustment of the fair market value of total gross assets shall be applied to any liability insurance that may be included in the definition of total gross assets by W.S. 1-1-135(c).

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 1-1-137.
Scope of
act.

The courts of this state shall construe the provisions of this act liberally with regard to successors.

This act shall apply to all asbestos claims filed against a successor on or after July 1, 2011.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 117, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 1-1-138.
Donation
of emergency responder equipment; exemption from civil and criminal
liability; definitions; relation to other law.

Any person who donates surplus emergency response equipment to any emergency responder shall not be liable for damages in any civil action or subject to prosecution in any criminal proceeding resulting from the nature, age, condition or packaging of such equipment; except that this exemption shall not apply to the grossly negligent, willful, wanton or reckless acts of donors.

As used in this section:

“Emergency responder” means as provided in W.S. 35-9-152(a)(i);

“Emergency response equipment” means all equipment designed for or typically used in the course of performing the duties required of an emergency responder.

Should any grant of immunity, exception or imposition of liability within the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

, conflict with any provision of this section, the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act shall prevail.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 65, § 1; 2017 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017,
in the middle of (c), substituted “1-38-120” for “1-39-121.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2011, Chapters 65 and 117 both enacted W.S.

1-1-131

.
This section, as enacted by Laws 2011, Chapter 65, has been redesignated as W.S.

1-1-138

at the direction of the legislative service office.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 65, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved February 22, 2011.

§ 1-1-139.
Civil liability for female genital mutilation.

A person who is the victim of female genital mutilation as defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xvii) may maintain a civil action against an individual who engages in conduct that is prohibited under W.S. 6-2-502(a)(v) for damages incurred by the victim as a result of that conduct. The victim may also be awarded exemplary damages, reasonable attorney’s fees, costs of the action and any other appropriate relief. A victim of female genital mutilation may bring a civil action under this section at any time within ten (10) years of:

The procedure being performed; or

The victim’s eighteenth birthday.

A civil action may be maintained under this section whether or not the individual who is alleged to have engaged in conduct prohibited under W.S. 6-2-502(a)(v) has been charged or convicted under W.S. 6-2-502(a)(v) for the alleged crime.

Neither the pendency nor the termination of a civil action under this section shall prevent the criminal prosecution of a person who violates W.S. 6-2-502(a)(v).

History.

2020 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 105, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 1-1-140.
Public utility exemption from civil liability; catastrophes caused by an act of God.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a public utility is not liable for damages to real or personal property or damages for claims resulting from economic losses in any civil action against the public utility for a catastrophe caused by an act of God.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to damages if a negligent, willful, wanton or reckless act of the public utility was a proximate cause of the catastrophe.

As used in this section:

“Economic losses” includes damages caused by a failure to provide an adequate supply of gas, electricity, water, solid or liquid waste collection or disposal, heating and ground transportation;

“Municipality” means as defined in W.S. 37-1-101(a)(iii);

“Public utility” means as defined in W.S. 37-1-101(a)(vi), excluding the state or a municipality.

Should any grant of immunity, exception or imposition of liability within the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

, conflict with any provision of this section, the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act shall prevail.

History.

2020 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 77, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2020, ch. 77, § 2, provides: “It is intended by this act to codify the common law existing in this state as of July 1, 2020, as it relates to the liability of a public utility for damages to real or personal property or damages for claims resulting from economic losses in a civil action against a public utility for a catastrophe caused by an act of God.”

§ 1-1-141.
COVID-19 exposure and illness; assumption of the risk.

As used in this section:

“Claimant” means any person or estate of a person seeking recovery of damages in a COVID-19 liability claim;

“COVID-19” means severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 (SARS-CoV-2) and any mutation or viral fragments thereof or any disease or condition caused by severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 (SARS-CoV-2) that was the subject of the public health emergency declared by the governor under W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i) on March 13, 2020;

“COVID-19 liability claim” means a cause of action for:

The transmission, infection, exposure or potential exposure of COVID-19 to a claimant:

At any health care facility or on any person’s or entity’s premises that resulted in injury to or death of the claimant; or

Caused by the actions of any health care provider or other person that resulted in injury to or death of the claimant.

Acts or omissions by a health care facility or provider in arranging for or providing health care services or medical care to the claimant that resulted in injury to or death of the claimant, or where the response to COVID-19 reasonably interfered with the arranging for or the providing of health care services or medical care for the claimant; or

Manufacturing, labeling, donating or distributing personal protective equipment or sanitizer that is directly related to the provision of personal protective equipment or sanitizer to the claimant by any person or entity during the public health emergency declared under COVID-19 that departs from the normal manufacturing, labeling, donating or distributing of personal protective equipment by an entity and that proximately causes injury to or the death of the claimant.

“Personal protective equipment” means equipment worn to minimize exposure to hazards that cause injury or illness, including gloves, masks, face shields, safety glasses, shoes, earplugs, muffs, respirators, coveralls, vests and full body suits;

“Sanitizer” means any substance generally used to decrease infectious agents including viruses on the body, objects or other spaces that receive human contact.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, in any action involving a COVID-19 liability claim against a person or entity, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the claimant accepted and assumed the risk of catching COVID-19 if the claimant entered the premises of another person or entity.

The assumption of risk specified in subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or restrict the immunity available in W.S. 35-4-114(d) or any other immunity available under law.

History.

2021 ch. 118, § 1, effective April 6, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 118, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 6, 2021.